South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5057.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 150, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-150-420.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall permit a lottery retailer to sell lottery tickets through lottery ticket vending machines. The lottery ticket vending machines also may distribute prizes up to the amount the lottery retailer is authorized to distribute. Lottery ticket vending machines must require ID verification before purchase. The provisions of this chapter are applicable to the use of lottery ticket vending machines. For purposes of this section, "lottery ticket vending machine" means a self-service, automated kiosk that allows the purchase of lottery tickets. SECTION 2.  Section 12-21-2710 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 12-21-2710.  (A) It is unlawful for any person to keep on his premises or operate or permit to be kept on his premises or operated within this State any vending or slot machine, or any video game machine with a free play feature operated by a slot in which is deposited a coin or thing of value, or other device operated by a slot in which is deposited a coin or thing of value for the play of poker, blackjack, keno, lotto, bingo, or craps, or any machine or device licensed pursuant to Section 12-21-2720 and used for gambling or any punch board, pull board, or other device pertaining to games of chance of whatever name or kind, including those machines, boards, or other devices that display different pictures, words, or symbols, at different plays or different numbers, whether in words or figures or, which deposit tokens or coins at regular intervals or in varying numbers to the player or in the machine, but the provisions of this section do not extend to coin-operated nonpayout pin tables, in-line pin games, or to automatic weighing, measuring, musical, and vending machines which are constructed as to give a certain uniform and fair return in value for each coin deposited and in which there is no element of chance. (B) Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned for a period of not more than one year, or both. (C) This section does not apply to the development, manufacture, processing, selling, possessing, provision of technical aid, or transporting of any printed materials, gaming equipment, devices, or other materials, software, or hardware used or designated for use in out-of-state jurisdictions by a gaming device manufacturer. A gaming device manufacturer is a manufacturing entity that is in good standing with the South Carolina Secretary of State's Office, is registered with the United States Department of Justice Gambling Device Registration Unit, is authorized to do business in the State of South Carolina, and has all appropriate business licensure and zoning authorization necessary to operate a manufacturing facility in the jurisdiction in which the manufacturing facility is located. Any transportation of gaming devices authorized in this section must comply with all applicable federal laws. This section may not be construed so as to prohibit communications between persons in this State and persons involved with such legal lotteries or gaming devices relative to such printed materials, equipment, devices, or other materials, software, or hardware. (D) This section does not apply to the lottery ticket vending machines authorized by Section 59-150-420. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----